Ohio, session 136, SB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The Ohio Food and Agriculture Policy 3
Council is created to make recommendations to the General 4
Assembly regarding food systems that strengthen the state's food 5
and farm economies. The Council shall engage in advocacy, 6
education, and policy work to enhance the health and wellness of 7
the citizens of Ohio and to encourage the sustainability of 8
natural resources. 9
(B) The Council shall consist of the Director of 10
Agriculture or the Director's designee and all of the following 11
members appointed by the Governor: 12
(1) One member who represents the Ohio Hospital 13
Association; 14
(2) One member who represents Ohio State University 15
Extension; 16
(3) One member who represents Central State University 17
Extension; 18

S. B. No. 288 Page 2
As Introduced
(4) Three members who represent the Ohio Farm Bureau; 19
(5) One member who represents urban farming; 20
(6) One member who represents rural farming; 21
(7) One member who represents statewide food banks; 22
(8) One member who is a registered lobbyist who represents 23
Ohio cooperatives. 24
(C)(1) The Governor shall make appointments to the Council 25
not later than sixty days after the effective date of this 26
section. The Council shall convene not later than ninety days 27
after the effective date of this section. Each appointed member 28
of the Council shall serve for a four-year term. Each appointed 29
member is subject to removal at the pleasure of the Governor. 30
Any vacancy on the Council shall be filled in the same manner as 31
the original appointment. After the expiration of each appointed 32
member's four-year term, the Council ceases to exist. 33
(2) The Council shall be considered a part of the 34
Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes. The 35
Director of Agriculture or the Director's designee shall serve 36
as Chairperson of the Council. The Council may request from the 37
Director, and the Director shall provide, meeting space, 38
assistance, services, and information to enable the Council to 39
carry out its duties. 40
(D) The Council shall develop a statewide plan containing 41
policy and funding recommendations for promoting and supporting 42
an equitable, healthy, and sustainable food system on the state 43
and local level. The Council shall engage in educational 44
outreach and shall make recommendations to the General Assembly 45
as needed. The Council also shall compile and deliver, not later 46
than the first day of March each year, an annual report to the 47

S. B. No. 288 Page 3
As Introduced
General Assembly detailing the Council's recommendations 48
concerning all of the following topics: 49
(1) Food security; 50
(2) Food access; 51
(3) Food production and distribution; 52
(4) Food waste; 53
(5) Economic development; 54
(6) Food procurement; 55
(7) Food chain workers; 56
(8) Food systems resilience. 57
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 58
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 59
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 60
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 61
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 62
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 63
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 64
Section 3. 65
66
1 2 3 4 5
A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 700514 Special Projects $500,000 $0
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $500,000 $0

S. B. No. 288 Page 4
As Introduced
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $500,000 $0
SPECIAL PROJECTS 67
The foregoing appropriation item 700514, Special Projects, 68
shall be used to support the activities of the Ohio Food and 69
Agriculture Policy Council established under Section 1 of this 70
act. 71
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 72
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 73
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 74
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 75
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 76
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 77
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 78
applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 79